Hawaii statutes.
[TITLE
23A. OTHER BUSINESS ENTITIES]

Chapter

428 Uniform Limited Liability Company Act

429 Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association
Act

CHAPTER
428

UNIFORM
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY ACT

Part I. General Provisions

Section

428-101 Definitions

428-102 Knowledge and notice

428-103 Effect of operating agreement;
nonwaivable

provisions

428-104 Supplemental principles of law

428-105 Name

428-105.5 Administrative order of abatement for
infringement

of limited liability company name

428-106 Reserved name

428-107 Registered agent

428-108 Change of registered agent

428-109 Resignation of registered agent

428-110 Service of process

428-111 Nature of business and powers

Part II. Organization

428-201 Limited liability company as legal
entity

428-202 Organization

428-203 Articles of organization

428-204 Articles of amendment

428-204.5 Amended and restated articles of
organization

428-204.6 Restated articles of organization

428-205 Signing of records

428-206 Filing in office of director; effective
time and

date

428-207 Correcting filed record

428-208 Liability for false statement in filed
record

428-209 Filing by judicial act

428-210 Annual report

Part III. Relations of Members and
Managers to

Persons Dealing with the
Limited Liability

Company

428-301 Agency of members and managers

428-302 Limited liability company liable for
member's or

manager's actionable conduct

428-303 Liability of members and managers

Part IV. Relations of Members to One
Another and to

the Limited Liability Company

428-401 Form of contribution

428-402 Member's liability for contributions

428-403 Member's and manager's rights to
payments and

reimbursement

428-404 Management of the limited liability
company

428-405 Sharing of and right to distributions

428-406 Limitations on distributions

428-407 Liability for unlawful distributions

428-408 Member's right to information

428-409 General standards of member's and
manager's conduct

428-410 Actions by members

428-411 Continuation of limited liability
company after

expiration of specified term

Part V. Transferees and Creditors of
Members

428-501 Member's distributional interest

428-502 Transfer of distributional interest

428-503 Rights of a transferee

428-504 Rights of creditors

Part VI. Member's Dissociation

428-601 Events causing a member's dissociation

428-602 Member's power to dissociate; wrongful
dissociation

428-603 Effect of a member's dissociation

Part VII. Member's Dissociation When
Business Not

Wound Up

428-701 Company purchase of distributional
interest

428-702 Court action to determine fair value of

distributional interest

428-703 Dissociated member's power to bind the
limited

liability company

428-704 Statement of dissociation

Part VIII. Winding Up the Company's
Business

428-801 Events causing dissolution and winding
up of

company's business

428-802 Limited liability company continues
after

dissolution

428-803 Right to wind up the limited liability
company's

business

428-804 Member's or manager's power and
liability as agent

after dissolution

428-805 Articles of termination

428-806 Distribution of assets in winding up the
limited

liability company's business

428-807 Known claims against dissolved limited
liability

company

428-808 Notice; other claims against dissolved
limited

liability company

428-809 Grounds for administrative termination

428-810 Procedure for and effect of
administrative

termination

428-811 Reinstatement following administrative
termination

428-812 Appeal from denial of reinstatement

Part IX. Conversions and Mergers

428-901 Definitions

428-901.5 Foreign mergers

428-902 Repealed

428-902.5 Conversion into and from limited
liability companies

428-902.6 Articles of conversion

428-903 Effect of conversion

428-904 Merger

428-905 Articles of merger

428-906 Effect of merger

428-907, 908 Repealed

Part X. Foreign Limited Liability
Companies

428-1001 Law governing foreign limited liability
companies

428-1002 Application for certificate of authority

428-1003 Activities not constituting transacting
business

428-1004 Issuance of certificate of authority

428-1005 Name of foreign limited liability
company

428-1005.5 Change of name by foreign limited
liability

company

428-1006 Revocation of certificate of authority

428-1007 Cancellation of authority

428-1008 Effect of failure to obtain certificate
of authority

428-1009 Action by attorney general

428-1010 Repealed

Part XI. Derivative Actions

428-1101 Right of action

428-1102 Proper plaintiff

428-1103 Pleading

428-1104 Expenses

Part XII. Miscellaneous Provisions

428-1201 Uniformity of application and
construction

428-1202 Repealed

428-1203 Certificates and certified copies to be
received in

evidence

428-1204 Interrogatories by director

Part XIII. Fees, Charges, and Penalties

428-1301 Fees

428-1302 Penalties

Cross References

Limited liability partnerships, see §§425‑151 to 173.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Proposed Limited Liability Company Act in Hawai‘i. 18 UH
L. Rev. 483.

The "Aloha Corporation:" Infusing the Culture of
Hawai‘i to Broaden the Perspective of Business and Return to Community. 34 UH
L. Rev. 221 (2012).

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next